Tennessee, session 114, HB1992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-25-109(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(f)
(1) The authority is attached to the department of environment and
conservation for administrative support purposes only. Such administrative
support includes, but is not limited to, the hiring of staff persons. For all other
purposes, the authority is independent from the department. The autonomy and
powers of the authority are not affected by the attachment, and the department
has no other supervisory control over the council.
(2) Staff persons employed by the authority are considered full-time
employees of the department of environment and conservation and are subject to
applicable personnel laws, rules, and policies, including, but not limited to, leave,
compensation, classification, and travel requests.
(3) Employees serving as staff for the authority are state employees as
defined under § 8-42-101, and are eligible for retirement benefits from the
Tennessee consolidated retirement system, health insurance benefits, and other
insurance benefits available to state employees. This subsection (f) is subject to
the specific appropriation of funds by the general assembly.
HB1992
011501
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-25-113, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) The authority is subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury in the same
manner as the department of environment and conservation is audited.
(b)
(1) If approved by the comptroller of the treasury, the authority may
employ a licensed independent public accountant to perform the audit.
(2) If the authority employs a licensed independent public accountant to
perform the audit, the employment contract between the authority and the
independent accountant must be made pursuant to the terms and on forms
prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.
(3) The authority shall pay the cost of any audit required by this section.
(c) The comptroller of the treasury shall ensure that audits are prepared in
accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determine if
the audits meet minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.
No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this section until approved by
the comptroller of the treasury.
(d) A copy of the audit must be furnished to each member of the authority and to
the comptroller of the treasury.
(e) The comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller of the treasury's
designated representative, shall have access to the authority's books, records, and
accounts whenever such access is deemed necessary by the comptroller of the treasury
or the comptroller of the treasury's designated representative.
(f) The authority shall prepare an annual report of its business affairs and
transactions, a copy of which must be made available for public inspection, and filed by
- 2 - 011501

January 31 of each year with the comptroller of the treasury, the governor, the speaker
of the house of representatives, and the speaker of the senate.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011501